District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

10-1005

Organization.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 26, 1999, D.C. Law 12-175, § 1806, 45 DCR 7193
Dec. 7, 2004, D.C. Law 15-205, § 3102(b), 51 DCR 8441
June 16, 2006, D.C. Law 16-127, § 3(b), 53 DCR 4712
Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-191, § 37(b), 53 DCR 6794
Mar. 11, 2010, D.C. Law 18-115, § 3(c), 57 DCR 886
Sept. 14, 2011, D.C. Law 19-21, § 1032(a), 58 DCR 6226

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 9-1105.

Temporary Addition of Section

For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 2 of Office of Property Management Reform Temporary Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Law 15-57, December 9, 2003, law notification 51 DCR 1792).
For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 2 of Office of Property Management Reform Temporary Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Law 15-202, December 7, 2004, law notification 52 DCR 446).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary addition of section, see § 1406 of the Fiscal Year 1999 Budget Support Emergency Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-401, July 13, 1998, 45 DCR 4794), and § 1406 of the Fiscal Year 1999 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-564, January 12, 1999, 46 DCR 669).
For temporary (90-day) addition of Chapter 11, see notes following § 10-1001.
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3102(b) of Fiscal Year 2005 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-486, August 2, 2004, 51 DCR 8236).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3102(b) of Fiscal Year 2005 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-594, October 26, 2004, 51 DCR 11725).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 1012(a) of Fiscal Year 2012 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2011 (D.C. Act 19-93, June 29, 2011, 58 DCR 5599).